Alabama, session 2026rs, SB354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1)SOLAR POWER FACILITY. A large-scale, ground-mounted
installation of photovoltaic panels that are designed to
generate electricity using solar power for use off-site or
sale to a third party, including all equipment and facilities
required to operate the facility and transmit generated
electricity.
(2) UNDER CONSTRUCTION. Construction of a solar power
facility has begun pursuant to Internal Revenue Service
regulations adopted pursuant to 26 U.S.C. §§ 45Y and 48E
defining beginning of construction and any other regulations,
procedures, or other published information or guidance
pursuant to that federal law.
(b) For one year after the effective date of this act,
a solar power facility not operating or under construction on
Page 1

a solar power facility not operating or under construction on
SB354 Engrossed
the effective date of this act may not be constructed or
operated unless a proposed solar power facility operator holds
a public hearing, after 30 days notice, on the proposed solar
power facility in the county in which the proposed solar power
facility will be located.
(c) This act shall only apply to counties contiguous to
the Gulf of America due to the significant population
increases therein, limited availability of suitable real
property, and need to protect the unique environmental aspects
of river deltas and the gulf.
(d) For one year after the effective date of this act,
the governing body of a county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of this state may not adopt an
ordinance, regulation, or other policy related to a proposed
or existing solar power facility that is more stringent than
the requirements of this section.
Section 2. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"carbon dioxide storage facility" shall mean a storage
facility used for the storage and sequestration of carbon
dioxide, as contemplated in Article 6, Chapter 17, Title 9,
Code of Alabama 1975, which is located on public land or which
is 50,000 acres or more in size.
(b) For one year after the effective date of this act,
a carbon dioxide storage facility not operating or under
construction on the effective date of this act may not be
constructed or operated.
Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB354 Engrossed


Senate
Read for the first time and referred ................10-Mar-26
to the Senate committee on
Transportation and Energy

Read for the second time and placed ................11-Mar-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................07-Apr-26
as amended
Yeas 27
Nays 4
Abstains 0


Patrick Harris,
Secretary.

Page 3